Utah statutes.
31A-28-118.   Stay of proceedings -- Reopening default judgments.
(1)  A proceeding in which the insolvent insurer is a party in any court in
this state shall be stayed 180 days from the date an order of liquidation,
rehabilitation, or conservation is final to permit proper legal action by the
association on any matters germane to its powers or duties.
(2)  The association may apply to have a judgment under any decision, order,
verdict, or finding based on default set aside by the same court that made the
judgment.  The association shall be permitted to defend against the suit on
the merits.
